Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 9. APPLICABILITY OF LAW TO COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS

CHAPTER 274. LAW APPLICABLE TO CONTRACT MADE OVER INTERNET

Sec. 274.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "Internet" means the largest nonproprietary nonprofit cooperative public computer network, popularly known as the Internet.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 274.002. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER; EXCEPTION. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), this chapter applies only to a contract made solely over the Internet between a person located in this state and a person located outside this state who does not maintain an office or agent in this state for transacting business in this state.

(b) This chapter does not apply to a contract to which Chapter 271 applies.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 274.003. STATE LAW GOVERNING CONTRACT; BURDEN OF PROOF. (a) A contract is governed by the law of this state unless each party to the contract who is located in this state:

(1) is given notice that the law of the state in which another party to the contract is located applies to the contract; and

(2) agrees to the application of that state's law.

(b) A person asserting that the law of another state governs a contract has the burden of proving that notice was given and agreement was obtained as specified by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 274.004. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW TO CONTRACT. Section 1.031 and Chapter 273 do not apply to a contract to which this chapter applies.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.